New Mexico, session 2026, HB197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 30-16-1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1963, Chapter 303, Section 16-1, as amended) is amended to read: "30-16-1. LARCENY.-- A. Larceny consists of the stealing of anything of value that belongs to another. B. Whoever commits larceny when the value of the property stolen is two hundred fifty dollars ($250) or less is guilty of a petty misdemeanor. C. Whoever commits larceny when the value of the property stolen is over two hundred fifty dollars ($250) but not more than five hundred dollars ($500) is guilty of a misdemeanor. D. Whoever commits larceny when the value of the property stolen is over five hundred dollars ($500) but not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) is guilty of a fourth degree felony. E. Whoever commits larceny when the value of the property stolen is over two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) but not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) is guilty of a third degree felony. F. Whoever commits larceny when the value of the property stolen is over twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) is guilty of a second degree felony. G. Whoever commits larceny when the property of value stolen is livestock is guilty of a third degree felony regardless of its value. H. Whoever commits larceny when the property of value stolen is a firearm is guilty of a [fourth] third degree felony when its value is less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500)." - 2 -